District of Columbia statutes.
44-302.03

Direct access to qualified specialists for females’ health services.

(a)

Every health benefits plan that requires or provides a member with the opportunity to designate a participating primary care provider, shall permit a member who is female to designate as her primary care provider a participating physician or advance practice registered nurse who specializes in obstetric and gynecology.

(b)

If a member who is female does not designate a participating physician or advance practice registered nurse as described in subsection (a) of this section as her primary care provider, the health benefits plan may not require authorization or referral by the member’s primary care provider, or otherwise, in order for the member to receive routine obstetrical or gynecological services from a participating obstetrician or gynecologist or advance practice registered nurse described in subsection (a) of this section.

(c)

For the purposes of this section “routine obstetrical and gynecological services” means the full scope of medically necessary services provided by the obstetrician or gynecologist or advance practice registered nurse described in subsection (a) of this section in the care of, or related to, the female reproductive system and breasts and in performing annual screening and immunizations for disorders and diseases in accordance with nationally recognized medical practice.

(d)

Nothing in this section shall prohibit an insurer or Health Maintenance Organization from requiring a participating obstetrician or gynecologist or advance practice registered nurse as described in subsection (a) of this section to provide written notification to the covered female’s primary care physician of any visit to such obstetrician or gynecologist or advance practice registered nurse. The notification may include a description of the health care services rendered at the time of the visit.

Apr. 27, 1999, D.C. Law 12-274, § 203, 46 DCR 1294
1981 Ed., § 32-572.3.